District of Columbia statutes.
7-2853

Reporting.

Any person involved in an exposure incident within the District shall report the incident to the Director within 90 days of its occurrence. The report shall include the date and time of the exposure, the type and brand of sharp involved in the exposure incident, and a description of the exposure incident. The Director shall compile an annual report of all exposure incidents within the District and make the report available to the public upon request.

Apr. 4, 2001, D.C. Law 13-272, § 4, 48 DCR 1633